el: Υλικό της λαβίδας/οδοντογλυφίδας της διακοσμητικής ομπρέλας κοκτέιλ: Μπαμπού; Βιοδιασπώμενα υλικά; Μέταλλο; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Ξύλο; Άλλο
en: Cocktail umbrella handle/pick material: Bamboo; Biodegradable materials; Metal; Paper; Plastic; Wood; Other
cs: Materiál špejle koktejlového deštníčku: Bambus; Biologicky rozložitelné materiály; Kov; Papír; Plast; Dřevo; Jiné
it: handle/materiale per ombrellino da cocktail: Bambù; Materiali biodegradabili; Metallo; Carta; Plastica; Legno; Altro
ja: カクテルアンブレラのハンドル／ピック素材: 竹; 生分解性素材; 金属; 紙; プラスチック; 木; その他
nl: Cocktailparaplu handgreep-/prikker materiaal: Bamboe; Biologisch afbreekbare materialen; Metaal; Papier; Plastic; Hout; Overig
pt-PT: Identificador/material de palito de guarda-chuva de cocktail: Bambu; Materiais biodegradáveis; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Madeira; Outro
sv: Pinnens material: Bambu; Biologiskt nedbrytbara material; Metall; Papper; Plast; Trä; Övrigt
da: Materiale til cocktailparaplyens skaft/spids: Bambus; Bionedbrydelige materialer; Metal; Papir; Plastik; Træ; Andet
sk-SK: Materiál rukoväte/špajdle koktejlového dáždnika: Bambus; Biologicky rozložiteľné materiály; Kov; Papier; Plast; Drevo; Iné
tr: Kokteyl şemsiyesi çubuk malzemesi: Bambu; Biyolojik olarak parçalanabilen malzemeler; Metal; Kağıt; Plastik; Ahşap; Diğer
de: Material von Griff bzw. Stab des Cocktailschirms: Bambus; Biologisch abbaubare Materialien; Metall; Papier; Kunststoff; Holz; Andere
ko: 칵테일우산 손잡이/소재 선택: 대나무; 생분해성 소재; 금속; 종이; 플라스틱; 목재; 기타
zh-TW: 雞尾酒傘柄/籤材質: 竹製; 可生物降解材質; 金屬; 紙製; 塑膠; 木製; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal za dršku/trzalicu kišobrana za koktele: Bambus; Biorazgradivi materijali; Metal; Papir; Plastika; Drvo; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kokteilinio skėčio rankenėlės / smeigtuko medžiaga: Bambukas; Biologiškai skaidžios medžiagos; Metalas; Popierius; Plastikas; Medis; Kita
vi: Chất liệu tay cầm/que xiên ô cocktail: Tre; Chất liệu phân hủy sinh học; Kim loại; Giấy; Nhựa; Gỗ; Khác
hu: Koktélernyő nyelének/fogójának material: Bambusz; Biológiailag lebomló anyagok; Fém; Papír; Műanyag; Fa; Egyéb
pl: Materiał uchwytu/patyczka parasolki koktajlowej: Bambus; Materiały biodegradowalne; Metal; Papier; Plastik; Drewno; Inny
pt-BR: Material das haste/ponta do guarda-chuva de coquetel: Bambu; Materiais biodegradáveis; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Madeira; Outros
fi: Cocktail-sateenvarjon kahvan/tikun materiaali: Bambu; Biohajoavat materiaalit; Metalli; Paperi; Muovi; Puu; Muu
es: Material del asa/palillo de la sombrilla de cóctel: Bambú; Materiales biodegradables; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Madera; Otro
fr: Matériau de la poignée ou du pique d’ombrelle à cocktail: Bambou; Matériaux biodégradables; Métal; Papier; Plastique; Bois; Autre
ru: Материал ручки/шпажки коктейльного зонтика: Бамбук; Биоразлагаемые материалы; Металл; Бумага; Пластик; Дерево; Другое
ro-RO: Material pentru mâner/bețișor umbrelă cocktail: Bambus; Materiale biodegradabile; Metal; Hârtie; Plastic; Lemn; Altele
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำด้ามจับหรือไม้เสียบของร่มค็อกเทล: ไม้ไผ่; วัสดุย่อยสลายได้ทางชีวภาพ; โลหะ; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал на дръжката/клечката на коктейлния чадър.: Бамбук; Биоразградими материали; Метал; Хартия; Пластмаса; Дърво; Други
nb: Cocktailparaply referanse/plukkmateriale: Bambus; Biologisk nedbrytbare materialer; Metall; Papir; Plast; Tre; Annet
sl-SI: Material ročaja/zobotrebca dežnička za koktajl: Bambus; Biorazgradljivi materiali; Kovina; Papir; Plastika; Les; Drugo
zh-CN: 鸡尾酒伞签柄/插签材料: 竹子; 可生物降解材料; 金属; 纸; 塑料; 木材; 其他